Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-723. Members joining at same time as employer — Current service credit.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who became, or becomes, a member on the date his and her employer became, or becomes, a public employer in the system shall receive current service credit for employment with a public employer in the system but only if the employment occurred during the period from July 1, 1957, to the date the public employer entered the system in the case of state, county, or municipal employees or during the period from October 1, 1957, to October 1, 1965, in the case of nonteaching public school employees, and if the member pays, or causes to be paid, all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

The member shall receive credit for employment with the University of Arkansas System if the employee was not eligible for coverage or did not participate in a retirement plan authorized by the University of Arkansas System and by the laws of the State of Arkansas during that service.

The member may pay for all his or her current service credit or a portion thereof consisting of multiples of one (1) year.

Any member of the system who became, or becomes, a member on the date his or her employer became, or becomes, a public employer in the system and who did not, or does not, qualify for free prior service credit shall receive current service credit for employment with a public employer in the system or with the University of Arkansas System if the employee was not eligible for coverage or did not participate in a retirement plan authorized by the University of Arkansas and by the laws of the State of Arkansas. He or she shall receive credit only if he or she has at least five (5) years of current service credit since becoming a member of the system, and he or she pays, or causes to be paid, all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

The payment shall be made in a lump sum.

The member may pay for all his or her prior and interim current service or a portion thereof consisting of multiples of one (1) year.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 187, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 907, §§ 3, 4; 1985, No. 938, §§ 14, 15; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2549.3, 12-2549.4; Acts 1987, No. 327, §§ 1, 2; 1987, No. 461, § 2; 1997, No. 299, § 21.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 461, § 3, provided that this act shall be retroactive to June 30, 1957.

24-4-724. Members joining after employer — Current service credit.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who became, or becomes, a member after the date that his or her employer became, or becomes, a public employer in the system shall receive current service for employment with a public employer in the system or with a municipality in the State of Arkansas if the employee was not eligible for coverage or does not participate in or is not eligible to receive a benefit from a retirement plan authorized by a municipality in the State of Arkansas and by the laws of the State of Arkansas during employment.

He or she shall receive credit only if he or she has at least five (5) years of current service credit since becoming a member of the system and he or she pays, or causes to be paid, all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

As used in this subsection, employment by a municipality in the State of Arkansas shall include the mayor, city attorney, city treasurer, city clerk, clerk-treasurer, municipal judge, municipal court clerk, and any other city employee.

The compensation to be used in computing the payments shall be the compensation on which contributions would have been made had the person been a member of the system during the time for which current service credit is purchased.

The payment shall be made in a lump sum.

The member may pay for all his or her prior and interim current service or a portion thereof consisting of multiples of one (1) year.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 187, § 4; 1975, No. 907, § 5; 1985, No. 938, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2549.5; Acts 1987, No. 327, § 3; 1993, No. 432, § 11; 1997, No. 299, § 22; 2013, No. 337, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges…” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” This change made by Amendment 80 took effect July 1, 2001. Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), deleted “with the University of Arkansas system” preceding “or with a municipality” and deleted “the University of Arkansas or” following “authorized by”.

24-4-725. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning drainage improvement district employees, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 234, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2578 — 12-2578.4.

24-4-726. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 10, superseded the amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2861 and Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 1019 and 1020. The amendment by Acts 2019, No. 315 deleted
“and regulations” following “rules” in subsection (d). The amendment by Acts 2019, No. 910 inserted “or the Division of Correction Inmate Care and Custody Fund Account of the State General Government Fund” following “Government Fund” in subsection (b); and substituted “Division” for “Department” in subsection (f).

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning State penitentiary employees, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, § 10, effective March 13, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1965 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, §§ 1-3, 5, 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2555 — 12-2557, 12-2559, 12-2561, 12-2562; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2861; 2019, No. 910, §§ 1019, 1020.

24-4-727. War Memorial Stadium Commission employees.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is directed to include within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as created by this chapter, all employees of the War Memorial Stadium Commission who are not members of, or eligible for membership in, some other state-supported retirement system other than Social Security.

The effective date of membership of the employees in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be July 1, 1969. All the employees enrolled in the system shall be subject to the rights, privileges, and limitations prescribed in this chapter.

Every such employee shall become a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as a condition of continuing or obtaining employment with the commission.

Any employee included within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System pursuant to this section shall be given credit for service rendered prior to July 1, 1957, as an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, or as an employee of the commission, if the employee was so employed on July 1, 1957, and on July 1, 1969.

Any employee included within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by this section who was an employee of the commission on July 1, 1969, may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered to the commission from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1969.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee pays or causes to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund all necessary contributions, at the rate of four percent (4%) for the employee and four percent (4%) for the employer from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1967, and at the rate of four percent (4%) for the employee and five percent (5%) for the employer from July 1, 1967, to July 1, 1969, that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System during that time.

Interest at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum compounded annually from July 1, 1957, shall be paid on all contributions, which shall be paid in full on or before July 1, 1970.

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism on behalf of the commission shall pay into the fund such sums of money as are necessary to match the contributions of its employees in the same form and manner as other public employers and shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter, to the same extent as other public employers.

The payments received by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System under subsection (e) of this section shall be credited to the applicable employers' accumulation account.

The employee payments shall be credited to the member's individual account in the members' deposit account.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 125, §§ 1-6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2563 — 12-2568; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 41; 2017, No. 269, §
12; 2019, No. 910, §
5700.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the War Memorial Stadium Commission to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(a)(1)

The War Memorial Stadium Commission is transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 2 transfer under § 25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, are transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the War Memorial Stadium Commission are transferred to the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(d)

The members of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the War Memorial Stadium Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “Department of Parks and Tourism on behalf of the” in (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (e).

24-4-728. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning private waterworks systems employees, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 556, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2569.

24-4-729. Conservation district employees.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is directed to include within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as created by this chapter, all employees of conservation districts organized and operating under the provisions of this chapter.

The effective date of membership of the employees in the system shall be July 1, 1973.

The employees enrolled in the system shall be subject to the rights, privileges, and limitations prescribed in this chapter.

Every such employee shall become a member of the system as a condition of continuing or obtaining employment with any conservation district.

Any employee included within the membership of the system pursuant to this section shall be given credit for service rendered prior to July 1, 1957, as an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, or as an employee of a conservation district organized and operating under this chapter, if the employee was so employed on July 1, 1957, and on July 1, 1973.

Any employee included within the membership of the system by this section who is an employee of a conservation district on July 1, 1973, may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered as an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, or as an employee of a conservation district from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1973.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee pays or causes to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund all necessary contributions, at the rate of four percent (4%) for the employee and four percent (4%) for the employer from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1967, four percent (4%) for the employee and five percent (5%) for the employer from July 1, 1967, to July 1, 1969, and five percent (5%) for the employee and seven percent (7%) for the employer from July 1, 1969, to July 1, 1973, that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the system during that time.

Interest at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum compounded annually from July 1, 1957, shall be paid on all contributions, which shall be paid in full on or before July 1, 1974.

Each conservation district shall pay into the fund such sums of money as are necessary to match the contributions of its employees in the same form and manner as other public employers and shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter, to the same extent as other public employers.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 666, §§ 7-11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2575 — 12-2575.4; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 42.

24-4-730, 24-4-731. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning Arkansas Real Estate Commission employees and law clerks, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-730. Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 184, §§ 2-7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 71-1313 — 71-1318.

24-4-731. Acts 1961, No. 14, § 1; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 66, § 1; 1979, No. 211, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-361, 22-417.15.

24-4-732. Certain employees of state agencies — Early retirement incentives.

In addition to the provisions of § 24-4-601 et seq.:

A state employee who is an active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on March 12, 1987, and who is vested for a full age and service annuity and who has credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the State of Arkansas immediately prior to his or her retirement date, may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(E) of this section, provided the member retires during the period beginning with March 12, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. However, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment in which the state is the employer.

In addition to the member's regular annuity, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System will pay the cost of the employee's health and basic life insurance which he or she is eligible to continue as a retirant with the State Employees Group Insurance Plan.

This payment is to be for the retirant's coverage only and is to be paid from the date of his or her retirement until the retirant's death.

For the purpose of computing the state employee member's annuity, his or her highest annual salary will be substituted for his or her final average compensation.

For the purpose of computing the state employee member's annuity, he or she will receive additional service credit equal to ten percent (10%) of his or her existing service credit.

A state employee member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the contingency reserve fund of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

A state employee who is an active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on March 12, 1987, and who has credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the State of Arkansas immediately prior to his or her retirement date and who has credit for not less than ten (10) actual years of service and has attained age fifty-five (55) or has credit for not less than twenty-eight (28) actual years of service regardless of age may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(2)(B)-(F) of this section, provided he or she retires during the period beginning with March 12, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. However, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment in which the state is the employer.

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System will pay the cost of the state employee's health and basic life insurance which the member is eligible to continue as a retirant with the State Employees Group Insurance Plan.

The payment is to be for the retirant's coverage only and is to be paid from the date of his or her retirement until the retirant has attained age sixty-five (65).

For the purpose of computing the state employee member's annuity, his or her highest annual salary will be substituted for the member's final average compensation.

If the state employee member is within two (2) years of his or her full annuity age and if the member is eligible for an early reduced annuity as provided by § 24-4-510 or is within two (2) years of having thirty (30) years' actual credited service, then the member's annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

If the state employee member is within two (2) years of attaining the service requirement for a full annuity and has attained his or her full annuity age as provided by § 24-4-508 or is within two (2) years of having thirty (30) years' actual credited service, then the member's annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

A state employee member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the contingency reserve fund of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

Any employee of a state agency who is on April 8, 1987, an active member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and who is not a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System but who would otherwise qualify to retire before January 1, 1988, under the requirements of the Early Retirement Incentive Law of 1987, may elect to become a member, and his or her credited service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System will be transferred to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, subject to the following conditions:

The employee shall make the election on a form to be furnished by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, and the transfer shall become effective on the date of retirement;

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall certify to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System a record of the employee's service credit in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

The employee shall retire under the noncontributory provisions of § 24-3-216 [repealed], if, at the time of the transfer the member was a noncontributory member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and shall be entitled to a refund of employee contributions made in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System since January 1, 1978.

If, at the time of the transfer, the member was a contributory member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, then the employee shall retire under the contributory provisions of subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section;

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall pay monthly benefits to any employee covered by this section who elects to transfer from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for purposes of retiring under this section.

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall certify monthly the amount of benefits paid hereunder, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall immediately transfer the amount from their benefit account to the proper account designated by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

For those state employees who retire pursuant to the provisions of this section, the amount paid by the State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as the cost of the employee's health and basic life insurance shall not exceed the amount of the employer's contribution for the coverage on the date of the employee's retirement and may be reduced at the time the employee qualifies under Medicare or Medicaid programs.

Any future increase in the cost of this coverage shall be borne by the employee and not by the system from which the employee retired.

No position being vacated as a result of an employee retiring pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be filled without the written approval of the Governor or the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

For those state-elected constitutional officers and members of the General Assembly who, as members of the State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, would qualify by meeting all the requirements of this section to retire under the early retirement incentives in this section by January 1, 1988, the time period in which they may elect to retire under this section shall be extended to the last day of their current terms for which they are serving.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an elected official to continue to accumulate salary earnings in the system upon which his or her final annuity shall be based. An elected official opting to retire under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall have all contributions to the system terminated on December 31, 1987.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who qualifies by meeting all the requirements of this section to retire under the early retirement incentives in this section by January 1, 1988, and who suffered from a work-related injury for which benefits were paid under compensation laws after July 1, 1986, and before October 1, 1986, and whose final annuity would otherwise be reduced due to the reduced salary and lost credited service, shall be entitled to obtain credited service for the actual time period of reduced salary by paying to the system prior to December 31, 1987, the amount of money both he or she and his or her employer would have contributed on his or her behalf plus interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum calculated from the date the contributions would have been made until the date he or she makes payment to the system.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 187, §§ 1, 8, 9; 1987, No. 808, § 1; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 43.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Acts 1989, No. 446, § 2, provided:

“Any eligible member retiring under the provisions of Act 187 or Act 717 of 1987 pursuant to this act will be entitled to the retirement benefits and retirement incentives they would have been eligible to receive had they retired effective January 1, 1988.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 3, provided that:
“It is the intent of this Act to give fair and equal treatment to all employees and all elected officials under the Early Retirement Incentive Act.”

The Early Retirement Incentive Law of 1987, referred to in this section, is codified as §§ 24-4-732, 24-5-122, and 24-6-102.

Cross References.

Teacher retirement system — Benefits, § 24-7-701 et seq.

24-4-733. Certain county employees — Early retirement incentives.

In addition to the provisions of § 24-4-601 et seq.:

A county employee who is an active member of the County Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on April 7, 1987, and who is vested for a full age and service annuity and who has credit in the system for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the county immediately prior to his or her retirement date may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(D) of this section, provided the employee retires during the period beginning with April 7, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. Provided further, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment in which the county or any other county is the employer.

For the purpose of computing the county employee member's annuity, the member's highest annual salary will be substituted for his or her final average compensation.

For the purpose of computing the county employee member's annuity, the member will receive additional service credit equal to ten percent (10%) of his or her existing service credit.

A county employee member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the contingency reserve fund of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

A county employee who is an active member of the county division of the system on April 7, 1987, and who has credit in the system for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the county immediately prior to his or her retirement date and who has credit for not less than ten (10) actual years of service and has attained the age of fifty-five (55) or has credit for not less than twenty-eight (28) actual years of service regardless of age may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(2)(B)-(E) of this section, provided the member retires during the period beginning with April 7, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. Provided further, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment in which the county or any other county is the employer.

For the purpose of computing the county employee member's annuity, the member's highest annual salary will be substituted for his or her final average compensation.

If the county employee member is within two (2) years of his or her full annuity age and if the member is eligible for an early reduced annuity as provided by § 24-4-510 or is within two (2) years of having thirty (30) years' actual credited service, then his or her annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

If the county employee member is within two (2) years of attaining the service requirement for a full annuity and has attained his or her full annuity age as provided by § 24-4-508 or is within two (2) years of having thirty (30) years' actual credited service, the member's annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

A county employee member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the contingency reserve fund of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

No position being vacated as a result of a county employee's retiring pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be filled without the approval by resolution of the quorum court.

For those elected county constitutional officers who, as members of the county division of the system, would qualify by meeting all the requirements in subsection (a) of this section to retire under the early retirement incentives in subsection (a) of this section by January 1, 1988, the time period in which they may elect to retire shall be extended to the last day of their current terms for which they are serving.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow an elected official to continue to accumulate salary earnings in the system upon which his or her final annuity shall be based.

An elected official opting to retire under subsection (c) of this section shall have all contributions to the system terminated on December 31, 1987.

As used in this section, “contingency reserve fund” means that amount of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's assets at cost determined by the annual actuarial valuation to be in excess of the total system benefit liabilities.

There shall be annual transfers between the employee's accumulation account and the contingency reserve fund as necessary to recognize the actuarially determined balance of that fund.

Any elected official who qualifies for retirement incentives under this section shall forfeit all retirement benefits if he or she knowingly and willfully misstates the amount of his or her credited service to the system.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 717, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 2; 1991, No. 1141, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 44.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The County Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, no longer exists as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 3, provided that:
“It is the intent of this Act to give fair and equal treatment to all employees and all elected officials under the Early Retirement Incentive Act.”

24-4-734 — 24-4-736. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning elected county constitutional officers retiring after July 1, 1987 and prior service for the secretaries and clerks of the Senate and House of Representatives and certain members of the House of Representatives, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. They were derived from the following sources:

24-4-734. Acts 1987, No. 352, § 1.

24-4-735. Acts 1987, No. 385, §§ 1, 2.

24-4-736. Acts 1987, No. 461, §§ 2, 3.

24-4-737. Certain city attorneys — Credited service.

When the term of office of an elected city attorney is cut short due to the change in the form of city government and that person is employed to serve as the city attorney for the remainder of his or her term, he or she shall receive credited service under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for the remainder of his or her term, or portion thereof, that he or she is employed as the city attorney, to the same extent as if he or she were an elected city attorney instead of an employed city attorney.

The provisions of this section shall be retroactive to January 1, 1986.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 975, §§ 1, 3.

24-4-738. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning annuity for mayor, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 723, § 2.

24-4-739. Municipal employees.

Any municipal employee or municipal official, including a municipal judge, municipal court clerk, mayor, city attorney, city treasurer, city clerk, clerk-treasurer, and deputy city clerk, who was erroneously enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System because of eligibility for membership in another system on or before January 1, 1991, may elect to remain a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or receive service credit in a reciprocal retirement system subject to employer certification that the employee was not enrolled in a local plan at the time of his or her employment.

Any employee as listed in subdivision (a)(1) of this section who, prior to this section, has been removed from membership in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System because of eligibility for membership in another system established pursuant to state law or any member of a reciprocal retirement system may restore the refunded service and establish subsequent service by paying or causing to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System the refunded contributions and the legally required contributions for subsequent service.

However, in no instance shall the same service time and related earnings be credited in more than one (1) system established pursuant to state law.

The employee or member shall make election in writing to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the eligible system within sixty (60) calendar days after being notified by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System of the erroneous enrollment.

Failure to make an election within sixty (60) calendar days will result in the employee's or member's being removed from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Should the employee or the member elect to become a member of the eligible system, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, or should the employee or member be removed from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System because of failure to elect, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System will refund to the employer all contributions, from both employee and employer, that were paid on behalf of the employee or member in question.

Upon receipt of the refunded contributions, the employer shall enroll and establish the proper service credit for the employee or member in the eligible system.

In the event a local plan is established as provided for by state law, any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who would otherwise be eligible for this local plan may elect to remain in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or become a member of the local plan.

This election shall be made in writing to both plans within thirty (30) days of the establishment of the local plan.

Any current member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who, prior to January 1, 1991, had employment with a participating municipal employer in which such employment was eligible for membership in a local plan may purchase such service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, provided the employer certifies that the person was not a member of a local plan.

The service will be credited only after such certification has been provided and the member has paid into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System an amount equal to that which would have been paid had the service been reported at the time rendered plus six percent (6%) interest compounded annually from the date such service was rendered until the date of purchase.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 221, §§ 1-3; 1993, No. 104, § 1; 1995, No. 1296, § 82.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The term “prior to this section” in (a)(2) appears as enacted.

Regarding references to municipal court judges, see note at § 24-4-724.

24-4-740. Transfer of Director of the Administrative Office of Courts to Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Effective July 1, 1993, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall cease to be a member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System. At that time, the director shall become a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The retirement and survivors' benefit to be received by the director occupying the position on July 1, 1993, shall not be less than that which he or she would have received under the provisions of § 24-8-218, including any increases after retirement, had he or she remained in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

Provided, further, he or she shall meet the eligibility requirements of § 24-8-215 and § 24-8-218 in order to receive the retirement and survivors' benefits provided under § 24-8-218 and shall meet the requirements of § 24-8-217 in order to receive the disability benefits provided under § 24-8-218.

The State of Arkansas, as employer, shall contribute to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System twelve percent (12%) of the salary amount of the director occupying the position on July 1, 1993.

The director occupying the position on July 1, 1993, shall contribute six percent (6%) of his or her pay until such time as he or she is eligible for retirement under the provisions of § 24-8-215.

Provided, further, all contributions made to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System by the employer on behalf of the director occupying the position on July 1, 1993, and all contributions made by the director, shall be transferred to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

In the event the director ceases to be a member prior to qualifying for retirement benefits, he or she shall be entitled to a refund of all contributions paid into the system by the director.

The retirement benefit to be received by any new person occupying the position of director after July 1, 1993, shall be based upon the regular annuity and benefit provisions for the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. The contributions to be made by the employer shall be the same as those required for the State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System. The person occupying the position thereafter shall not make contributions to the system.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 944, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

24-4-741. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credit for service in reciprocal system, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 448, §
11, effective March 13, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 1229, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 45.